Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-404
Sanitation; duty of employer.

All of the aforesaid places shall be kept clean and free from effluvia arising from any drain, privy or nuisance, and shall be ventilated and kept in a sanitary condition. The Department of Labor or any person authorized by the department may require such changes or additions to be made in any of the aforesaid places as will promote the best measures of sanitation.

Laws 1911, c. 67, § 4, p. 300;

Laws 1913, c. 103, § 1, p. 259;

R.S.1913, § 3591;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. IV, art. IV, § 4, p. 559;

C.S.1922, § 7685;

C.S.1929, § 48-404;

R.S.1943, § 48-404.